Louisiana, session 2026, SB91.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 881.8 and 890.4 are hereby enacted to
read as follows:
Art. 881.8. Resentencing for survivors of domestic abuse, human trafficking, or
sexual assault
A. For the purposes of this Article:
(1) "Domestic abuse" shall have the same definition as in R.S. 46:2132,
regardless of whether the conduct led to an arrest or conviction.
(2) "Human trafficking" shall be defined as the conduct prohibited by
R.S.14:46.2 or 46.3, regardless of whether the conduct led to an arrest or
conviction.
Page 1 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLSX 26RS-33 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 91
(3) "Sexual assault" shall have the same definition as in R.S. 46:2184,
regardless of whether the conduct led to an arrest or conviction.
(4) "Survivor" means a person who was subjected to domestic abuse,
human trafficking, or sexual assault.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a defendant
who meets the sentencing criteria set forth in Article 890.4, but was sentenced
prior to August 1, 2026, and is serving a sentence on or after August 1, 2026,
may file a motion for resentencing. The motion shall include:
(1) Documentation showing that the person is presently serving a
sentence for a felony offense not excluded by Article 890.4(C)(3), including but
not limited to a master prison record or other document.
(2) Documentation showing that the person was sentenced prior to
August 1, 2026, including but not limited to a minute entry of the sentencing
court, court transcript, uniform commitment order, or other document.
(3) At least one item of evidence meeting the requirements of Article
890.4(D).
C. Upon filing of a motion for resentencing under this Article, the clerk
of court shall promptly notify the district attorney and provide the district
attorney with a copy of the motion.
D.(1) If the court finds that the defendant's motion fails to comply with
the provisions of Paragraph B of this Article, it shall deny the motion without
prejudice.
(2)(a) If the court finds that the defendant's motion complies with the
provisions of Paragraph B of this Article, it shall conduct a resentencing
hearing, at which the court shall receive and consider evidence and argument
from the defendant and the state related to whether the applicant meets the
requirements for resentencing under Article 890.4(C).
(b) After the resentencing hearing, if the court finds that the defendant
meets the requirements for resentencing under Article 890.4(C), it shall vacate
Page 2 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLSX 26RS-33 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 91
the original sentence. After vacating the original sentence, the court shall
receive and consider any additional evidence and argument relevant to the
imposition of a new sentence, if either party offers to present additional
evidence or argument. The court shall then impose a reduced sentence as
provided for in Article 890.4(C)(1).
(c) After the resentencing hearing, if the court finds that the defendant
has not met the requirements for resentencing under Article 890.4(C), it shall
deny the motion with prejudice.
(3) Upon motion by the defendant and the state, if there is no genuine
issue of material fact, the court may determine that the defendant is eligible for
resentencing and resentence the defendant without an evidentiary hearing.
E. When determining the reduced sentence to impose under the
provisions of Article 890.4(C), the court shall consider the mitigating role of
domestic abuse, human trafficking, or sexual assault in the defendant's
commission of the offense. The court may also consider any facts or
circumstances relevant to the imposition of a new sentence submitted by the
defendant or the state. The court may consider evidence of the defendant's
rehabilitation since the initial sentencing, if evidence of rehabilitation is offered,
but the defendant shall not be required to present evidence of rehabilitation.
The court shall not order a new presentence investigation and report.
F. The court shall issue written findings of fact and reasons for its ruling
on the defendant's motion.
G. The defendant shall have the right of appeal from an order denying
the motion for resentencing or from a new sentence imposed under this Article.
H. A defendant who is resentenced under this Article shall be provided
with credit for time served prior to the resentencing.
* * *
Art. 890.4. Sentencing for survivors of domestic abuse, human trafficking, or
sexual assault
Page 3 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLSX 26RS-33 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 91
A. For the purposes of this Article:
(1) "Domestic abuse" shall have the same definition as in R.S. 46:2132,
regardless of whether the conduct led to an arrest or conviction.
(2) "Fraud, force, or coercion" shall have the same definition as in R.S.
14:46.2(C)(3), if the perpetrator subjected the survivor to domestic abuse,
human trafficking, or sexual assault.
(3) "Human trafficking" shall be defined as the conduct prohibited by
R.S.14:46.2 or 46.3, regardless of whether the conduct led to an arrest or
conviction.
(4) "Sexual assault" shall have the same definition as in R.S. 46:2184,
regardless of whether the conduct led to an arrest or conviction.
(5) "Survivor" means a person who was subjected to domestic abuse,
human trafficking, or sexual assault.
B. When imposing a sentence, the court shall consider as a mitigating
factor whether the defendant is a survivor, and if so, the role that domestic
abuse, human trafficking, or sexual assault played in the defendant's
commission of the instant offense.
C.(1) Upon motion of the defendant and after a contradictory hearing,
if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that at the time of the offense
the defendant was a survivor, and that domestic abuse, human trafficking, or
sexual assault was related to and a substantial contributing factor in causing the
defendant to commit the offense, the court shall depart from the otherwise
applicable sentence for the offense as follows:
(a) A sentence of life imprisonment without the possibility of parole shall
be reduced to not more than thirty years.
(b) A sentence of life imprisonment with the possibility of parole shall be
reduced to not more than twenty-five years.
(c) A sentence of imprisonment for thirty years or more, but less than
life, shall be reduced to not more than twenty years.
Page 4 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLSX 26RS-33 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 91
(d) A sentence of imprisonment for twenty years or more, but less than
thirty years, shall be reduced to not more than fifteen years.
(e) A sentence of imprisonment for fifteen years or more, but less than
twenty years, shall be reduced to not more than seven and one-half years.
(f) A sentence of imprisonment for eight years or more, but less than
fifteen years, shall be reduced to not more than five years.
(2) If the offense is a crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B), in order
to be eligible for a reduced sentence pursuant to Subsubparagraph (1)(a) of this
Paragraph, the defendant shall also be required to prove by clear and
convincing evidence that the victim of the instant offense was the perpetrator
of domestic abuse, human trafficking, or sexual assault against the defendant,
or that the perpetrator of domestic abuse, human trafficking, or sexual assault
against the defendant compelled the defendant's participation in the instant
offense through fraud, force, or coercion.
(3) The provisions of Subparagraphs (1) and (2) of this Paragraph shall
not apply to a sentence for any of the following:
(a) A conviction that would require the person to register as a sex
offender.
(b) A conviction resulting in a sentence of death.
(c) A conviction under R.S. 14:40.1 (terrorizing; menacing), 14:128.1
(terrorism), or 14:128.2 (aiding others in terrorism).
D.(1) A defendant who moves to be sentenced under Paragraph C of this
Article shall provide corroborating evidence in support of the motion. The fact
that the evidence has previously been introduced at a prior court proceeding
shall not be a basis for its exclusion as corroborating evidence.
(2) Corroborating evidence shall include one or more of the following:
(a) A court record.
(b) A presentence report.
(c) A social services record.
Page 5 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLSX 26RS-33 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 91
(d) A medical record.
(e) A sworn statement or prior testimony from a witness who is not the
defendant.
(f) A law enforcement record.
(g) A video or audio recording of the perpetrator of domestic abuse,
human trafficking, or sexual assault.
(h) An electronic or written communication from the perpetrator of
domestic abuse, human trafficking, or sexual assault.
(i) Records from a jail or the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections.
(j) Documentation prepared at or near the time of the commission or
prosecution of the offense tending to support the claims of the defendant.
(k) Verification of consultation with a licensed mental health care
provider, employee of a court acting within the scope of his employment,
member of the clergy, an attorney, a social worker, a rape crisis counselor, or
other advocate acting on behalf of an agency that assists survivors of domestic
abuse, human trafficking, or sexual assault.
(l) An expert report, affidavit, or declaration from a psychiatrist,
psychologist, social worker, mental health professional, or other expert in
domestic abuse, human trafficking, or sexual assault.
(m) Evidence, other than a statement of the defendant applying for relief
under this Article that would be admissible in a criminal prosecution of the
perpetrator of domestic abuse, human trafficking, or sexual assault against the
defendant, regardless of whether the perpetrator was or will be prosecuted for
that conduct.
(n) Documentation or other evidence which the court finds to be credible
and relevant to corroborating the defendant's claim of domestic abuse, human
trafficking, or sexual assault.
(3) In addition to the evidence described in Subparagraph (2) of this
Page 6 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLSX 26RS-33 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 91
Paragraph, the defendant may present other relevant evidence in the motion for
relief under this Article or at a resentencing hearing.
E.(1) If a defendant moves to be sentenced under Paragraph C of this
Article, at the sentencing hearing the court shall first receive and consider
evidence and argument from the defendant and the state related to whether the
defendant meets the requirements set forth in Paragraph C of this Article.
(2) If the court finds that the defendant has met the requirements to be
sentenced under Paragraph C of this Article, it shall receive and consider any
additional evidence and argument relevant to sentencing, if either party offers
to present additional evidence or argument, and impose a sentence under the
provisions of that Paragraph. The court shall consider the mitigating role of
domestic abuse, human trafficking, or sexual assault when determining the
sentence to impose under Paragraph C of this Article.
(3) If the court finds that the defendant has not met the requirements
under Paragraph C of this Article, it shall deny the defendant's motion.
(4) The court may determine that the defendant is eligible for relief
under this Article regardless of whether the defendant raised an affirmative
defense to the charged offense. Upon request of the defendant and the state, if
there is no genuine issue of material fact, the court may determine that the
defendant is eligible for sentencing under this Article and sentence the
defendant accordingly, without an evidentiary hearing.
F. The provisions of this Article shall apply to any defendant sentenced
on or after August 1, 2026. A defendant sentenced prior to August 1, 2026, shall
be eligible for relief pursuant to Article 881.8.
Section 2. Code of Evidence Art. 707 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 707. Expert testimony regarding survivors of domestic abuse, human
trafficking, or sexual assault
A witness who is qualified as an expert pursuant to Article 702 may
testify in the form of an opinion as to whether a defendant was a survivor of
Page 7 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLSX 26RS-33 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 91
domestic abuse, human trafficking, or sexual assault and as to the effect of that
domestic abuse, human trafficking, or sexual assault on the defendant. For
purposes of this Article, "survivor" shall have the same definition as in Code of
Criminal Procedure Articles 881.8 and 890.4.